California, session 20252026, AB553.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18919.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18919.1. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to maximize food access for all CalFresh recipients. Many of the hungriest Californians who rely on CalFresh to eat face the most significant barriers, including the lack of kitchen facilities or means of preparing and cooking meals with groceries, special dietary needs, or specific foods required for medications, among other factors that strain the ability of traditional groceries to meet their needs. It is further the intent of the Legislature to maximize the dignity and equitable treatment of Californians using CalFresh to purchase food by maximizing food choices.(b) The State Department of Social Services shall maximize all available food choices for CalFresh recipients, including, but not limited to, hot foods or hot food products ready for immediate consumption, pursuant to Section 3(k) of the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008.